Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1873, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 88, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 1873), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1873. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue until


July 1, 2025 2026, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma


Sunset Law, the Oklahoma Board of Licensed Alcohol and Drug


Counselors, consisting of seven (7) members, to be appointed by the


Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, as follows:


1. a. Six members who shall be alcohol and drug counselors


certified by an entity recognized to do professional


alcohol and drug counseling certification in this


state; provided, however, five of such members shall

Req. No. 10605 Page 1


subsequently secure licensure and one such member


shall subsequently secure certification, pursuant to


the provisions of the Licensed Alcohol and Drug


Counselors Act, no later than January 1, 2005.


b. Thereafter, five members shall be licensed alcohol and


drug counselors at the time of appointment, and one


member shall be certified as an alcohol and drug


counselor at the time of appointment.


c. Pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph, the


Governor shall appoint:


(1) four members from a list of names submitted by


the Oklahoma Drug and Alcohol Professional


Counselors Association,


(2) one member from a list of names submitted by the


Oklahoma Substance Abuse Services Alliance, and


(3) one member from a list of names submitted by the


Oklahoma Citizen Advocates for Recovery and


Treatment Association.


d. One member shall be appointed from and shall represent


the general public. Such member shall be a resident


of this state who has attained the age of majority and


shall not be, nor shall ever have been, a licensed or


certified alcohol and drug counselor, or the spouse of


a licensed or certified alcohol and drug counselor, or

Req. No. 10605 Page 2


a person who has ever had any material financial


interest in the provision of alcohol and drug


counseling services or has engaged in any activity


directly related to the practice of alcohol and drug


counseling.


2. The composition of the Board shall include five members who


hold a master's or higher degree and one member whose highest degree


held is a bachelor's degree.


3. The Governor shall appoint the members to the Board no later


than July 1, 2004.


B. Each member of the Board appointed as a licensed alcohol and


drug counselor shall:


1. Be certified or licensed to engage in the practice of


alcohol and drug counseling in this state and shall be in good


standing; and


2. Have at least three (3) years of experience in the practice


of alcohol and drug counseling in this state.


C. Two of the members initially appointed shall serve three-


year terms; two shall serve four-year terms and three shall serve


five-year terms, as designated by the Governor. Thereafter, the


terms of all members shall be five (5) years.


D. A vacancy on the Board shall be filled in the same manner as


the original appointment for the balance of the unexpired term.


Members may succeed themselves but shall serve no more than two

Req. No. 10605 Page 3


consecutive terms. Each member shall serve until a successor is


appointed and qualified.


E. Members of the Board may be removed from office for one or


more of the following reasons:


1. The refusal or inability for any reason to perform the


duties of a Board member in an efficient, responsible and


professional manner;


2. The misuse of office for pecuniary or material gain or for


personal advantage for self or another;


3. A violation of the laws or rules governing the practice of


alcohol and drug counseling; or


4. Conviction of a felony as verified by a certified copy of


the record of the court of conviction.


F. Members of the Board shall serve without compensation, but


shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel expenses as


provided in the State Travel Reimbursement Act.




60-1-10605 SW 12/04/24













Req. No. 10605 Page 4